Utah statutes.
41-6a-1613.   Lamp required for operation of vehicle on highway or adjacent
shoulder -- Dimming of lights.
(1) (a)  If a vehicle is  operated on a highway or shoulder adjacent  to the
highway under the conditions specified under Subsection 41-6a-1603(1)(a), the
operator of a vehicle shall use a high or low beam distribution of light or
composite beam except as provided under Subsection (1)(c).
(b)  Except as provided under Subsection (1)(c), the distribution of light or
composite beam shall be directed high enough and of sufficient intensity to
reveal persons and vehicles at a safe distance in advance of the vehicle.
(c)  The operator of a vehicle shall use a low beam distribution of light or
composite beam if the vehicle approaches:
(i)  an oncoming vehicle within 500 feet; or
(ii)  another vehicle from the rear within 300 feet.
(2) (a)  The low beam distribution of light or composite beam shall be aimed
to avoid projecting glaring rays into the:
(i)  eyes of an oncoming operator; or
(ii)  rearview mirror of a vehicle approached from the rear.
(b)  A vehicle  is not in violation of Subsection (2)(a) if:
(i)  the vehicle has not been significantly altered from the original vehicle
manufacturer's specifications; or
(ii)  the glaring rays result from road contour or a temporary load on the
vehicle.
